Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 3. Limited Partners.

§79-14-301.
Becoming limited partner.

Upon formation of a limited partnership, a person becomes a limited partner as agreed among the persons that are to be the initial partners.

After formation, a person becomes a limited partner:

As provided in the partnership agreement;

As the result of a transaction effective under Article 11;

With the affirmative vote or consent of all the partners; or

As provided in Section 79-14-801(a)(4) or (a)(5).

A person may become a limited partner without:

Acquiring a transferable interest; or

Making or being obligated to make a contribution to the limited partnership.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-301 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 301, effective from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to admission of limited partners.

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership §§ 901, 903.

68 C.J.S., Partnership § 589.

§79-14-302.
No agency power of limited partner as limited partner.

A limited partner is not an agent of a limited partnership solely by reason of being a limited partner.

A person’s status as a limited partner does not prevent or restrict law other than this chapter from imposing liability on a limited partnership because of the person’s conduct.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-302 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 302, effective from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to classes or groups of limited partners.

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership §§ 841-843.

§79-14-303.
No liability as limited partner for limited partnership obligations.

A debt, obligation, or other liability of a limited partnership is not the debt, obligation, or other liability of a limited partner. A limited partner is not personally liable, directly or indirectly, by way of contribution or otherwise, for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the partnership solely by reason of being or acting as a limited partner, even if the limited partner participates in the management and control of the limited partnership. This subsection applies regardless of the dissolution of the partnership.

The failure of a limited partnership to observe formalities relating to the exercise of its powers or management of its activities and affairs is not a ground for imposing liability on a limited partner for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the partnership.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former § 79-14-303 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 303, effective from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to the liability of limited partners to third parties.

Provision that, subject to this section, voting rights may be granted to all or certain identified limited partners or to specified classes or groups, see § 79-14-302.

Special partner held not to become liable as a general partner because, on general partner becoming sick, he looked over the business, examined the firm’s books, and stated that he expected to close out the business to pay creditors. E. C. Cropper & Co. v. Illinois Sewing Mach. Co., 100 Miss. 127, 54 So. 849, 1911 Miss. LEXIS 3 (Miss. 1911).

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership §§ 866,
874,
878,
879.

19 Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Partnership, Form 349.

68 C.J.S., Partnership §§ 591 et seq.

§79-14-304.
Rights to information of limited partner and person dissociated as limited partner.

On ten (10) days’ demand, made in a record received by the limited partnership, a limited partner may inspect and copy required information during regular business hours in the limited partnership’s principal office. The limited partner need not have any particular purpose for seeking the information.

During regular business hours and at a reasonable location specified by the limited partnership, a limited partner may inspect and copy information regarding the activities, affairs, financial condition, and other circumstances of the limited partnership as is just and reasonable if:

The limited partner seeks the information for a purpose reasonably related to the partner’s interest as a limited partner;

The limited partner makes a demand in a record received by the limited partnership, describing with reasonable particularity the information sought and the purpose for seeking the information; and

The information sought is directly connected to the limited partner’s purpose.

Not later than ten (10) days after receiving a demand pursuant to subsection (b), the limited partnership shall inform in a record the limited partner that made the demand of:

What information the partnership will provide in response to the demand and when and where the partnership will provide the information; and

The partnership’s reasons for declining, if the partnership declines to provide any demanded information.

Whenever this chapter or a partnership agreement provides for a limited partner to vote on or give or withhold consent to a matter, before the vote is cast or consent is given or withheld, the limited partnership shall, without demand, provide the limited partner with all information that is known to the partnership and is material to the limited partner’s decision.

Subject to subsection (j), on ten (10) days’ demand made in a record received by a limited partnership, a person dissociated as a limited partner may have access to information to which the person was entitled while a limited partner if:

The information pertains to the period during which the person was a limited partner;

The person seeks the information in good faith; and

The person satisfies the requirements imposed on a limited partner by subsection (b).

A limited partnership shall respond to a demand made pursuant to subsection (e) in the manner provided in subsection (c).

A limited partnership may charge a person that makes a demand under this section reasonable costs of copying, limited to the costs of labor and material.

A limited partner or person dissociated as a limited partner may exercise the rights under this section through an agent or, in the case of an individual under legal disability, a legal representative. Any restriction or condition imposed by the partnership agreement or under subsection (j) applies both to the agent or legal representative and to the limited partner or person dissociated as a limited partner.

Subject to Section 79-14-704, the rights under this section do not extend to a person as transferee.

In addition to any restriction or condition stated in its partnership agreement, a limited partnership, as a matter within the ordinary course of its activities and affairs, may impose reasonable restrictions and conditions on access to and use of information to be furnished under this section, including designating information confidential and imposing nondisclosure and safeguarding obligations on the recipient. In a dispute concerning the reasonableness of a restriction under this subsection, the partnership has the burden of proving reasonableness.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-304 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 304, effective from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to persons who make contributions to business enterprises and erroneously believe in good faith that they are limited partners. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-306.

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership §§ 884, 885.

68 C.J.S., Partnership § 597.

§79-14-305.
Limited duties of limited partners.

A limited partner shall discharge any duties to the partnership and the other partners under the partnership agreement and exercise any rights under this chapter or the partnership agreement consistently with the contractual obligation of good faith and fair dealing.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (a), a limited partner does not have any duty to the limited partnership or to any other partner solely by reason of acting as a limited partner.

If a limited partner enters into a transaction with a limited partnership, the limited partner’s rights and obligations arising from the transaction are the same as those of a person that is not a partner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-305 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 305, effective from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to rights to information of limited partners. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-304.

Statute providing that limited partner was to have right to accounting on same basis as general partner, “whenever circumstances render it just and reasonable,” did not create absolute right to accounting. Wholey v. Cal-Maine Foods, 700 So. 2d 291, 1997 Miss. LEXIS 300 (Miss. 1997).

Attorneys’ fees: cost of services provided by paralegals or the like as compensable element of award in state court.
73 A.L.R.4th 938.

§79-14-306.
Person erroneously believing self to be limited partner.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), a person that makes an investment in a business enterprise and erroneously but in good faith believes that the person has become a limited partner in the enterprise is not liable for the enterprise’s obligations by reason of making the investment, receiving distributions from the enterprise, or exercising any rights of or appropriate to a limited partner, if, on ascertaining the mistake, the person:

Causes an appropriate certificate of limited partnership, amendment, or statement of correction to be signed and delivered to the Secretary of State for filing; or

Withdraws from future participation as an owner in the enterprise by signing and delivering to the Secretary of State for filing a statement of negation under this section.

A person that makes an investment described in subsection (a) is liable to the same extent as a general partner to any third party that enters into a transaction with the enterprise, believing in good faith that the person is a general partner, before the Secretary of State files a statement of negation, certificate of limited partnership, amendment, or statement of correction to show that the person is not a general partner.

If a person makes a diligent effort in good faith to comply with subsection (a)(1) and is unable to cause the appropriate certificate of limited partnership, amendment, or statement of correction to be signed and delivered to the Secretary of State for filing, the person has the right to withdraw from the enterprise pursuant to subsection (a)(2) even if the withdrawal would otherwise breach an agreement with others that are or have agreed to become co-owners of the enterprise.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.